Utah statutes.
73-3b-201.   Application for a recharge permit -- Required information --
Filing fee.
(1)  The application for obtaining a groundwater recharge permit shall include
the following information:
(a)  the name and mailing address of the applicant;
(b)  the name of the groundwater basin or groundwater sub-basin in which the
applicant proposes to operate the project;
(c)  the name and mailing address of the owner of the land on which the
applicant proposes to operate the project;
(d)  a legal description of the location of the proposed project;
(e)  the source and annual quantity of water proposed to be stored
underground;
(f)  evidence of a water right or an agreement to use the water proposed to be
stored underground;
(g)  the quality of the water proposed to be stored underground and the water
quality of the receiving groundwater aquifer;
(h)  evidence that the applicant has applied for all applicable water quality
permits;
(i)  a plan of operation for the proposed recharge and recovery project which
shall include:
(i)  a description of the proposed project;
(ii)  its design capacity;
(iii)  a detailed monitoring program; and
(iv)  the proposed duration of the project;
(j)  a copy of a study demonstrating:
(i)  the area of hydrologic impact of the project;
(ii)  that the project is hydrologically feasible;
(iii)  that the project will not:
(A)  cause unreasonable harm to land; or
(B)  impair any existing water right within the area of hydrologic impact; and
(iv)  the percentage of anticipated recoverable water;
(k)  evidence of financial and technical capability; and
(l)  any other information that the state engineer requires.
(2) (a)  A filing fee must be submitted with the application.
(b)  The state engineer shall establish the filing fee in accordance with
Section 63J-1-504.
